Tennessee statutes. Title 42 Aeronautics
Chapter 6

Airport Zoning

42-6-101. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Airport” means any area of land or water designed and set aside for the landing and taking off of aircraft and utilized or to be utilized in the interest of the public for such purposes;

“Airport hazard” means any structure or tree or use of land that obstructs the airspace required for the flight of aircraft in landing or taking off at an airport or is otherwise hazardous to such landing or taking off of aircraft;

“Airport hazard area” means any area of land or water upon which an airport hazard might be established if not prevented as provided in this chapter;

“Incompatible use” means any structure or use of land, as identified in airport noise compatibility planning, in title 14 of the Code of Federal Regulations, part 150, which was promulgated pursuant to the former Aviation Safety and Noise Abatement Act of 1979, 49 U.S.C. § 2101 et seq. [repealed], concerning the exposure of residents or occupants in the vicinity of airports to aircraft noise; provided, that “incompatible use” does not apply in any county having a metropolitan form of government and having a population greater than one hundred thousand (100,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

“Person” means any individual, firm, copartnership, corporation, company, association, joint stock association, or body politic and includes any trustee, receiver, assignee, or other similar representative thereof;

“Political subdivision” means any municipality or county;

“Structure” means any object constructed or installed by humans, including, but not limited to, buildings, towers, smokestacks, and overhead transmission lines; and

“Tree” means any object of natural growth.

Acts 1945, ch. 74, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 2726.20 (Williams, § 2726.47); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 42-401; Acts 1992, ch. 594, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1992, ch. 594, § 6 provides that the amendment by that act does not apply in any county having a metropolitan form of government and having a population greater than one hundred thousand (100,000) according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

The Aviation Safety and Noise Abatement Act of 1979, referred to in this section, was repealed by Act July 5, 1994, P.L. 103-272, § 7(b), 108 Stat. 1379. For similar provisions, see 49 U.S.C. § 47101 et seq.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Grant of county zoning power, §13-7-101.

Grant of municipal zoning power, §13-7-201.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Airplanes and Airports, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Airports and Their Neighbors, 19 Tenn. L. Rev. 563.

Comparative Legislation. Airport zoning regulations:

Ala. Code §4-6-1 et seq.

Ark. Code §14-363-201 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. §6-3-21.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 183.861 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. §61-7-1 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 305.400 et seq.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 63-30 et seq.

Va. Code § 5.1-38.

42-6-102. Control of airport hazards is a public purpose.

It is found that an airport hazard endangers the lives and property of users of the airport and of occupants of land in its vicinity, and also, if of the obstruction type, in effect reduces the size of the area available for the landing, taking off and maneuvering of aircraft, thus tending to destroy or impair the utility of the airport and the public investment therein. Accordingly, it is declared that:

The creation or establishment of an airport hazard is a public nuisance and an injury to the community served by the airport in question;

It is, therefore, necessary in the interest of the public health, public safety, and general welfare that the creation or establishment of airport hazards be prevented; and

This should be accomplished, to the extent legally possible, by exercise of the police power, without compensation.

It is further declared that both the prevention of the creation or establishment of airport hazards and the elimination, removal, alteration, mitigation, or marking and lighting of existing airport hazards are public purposes for which political subdivisions may raise and expend public funds and acquire land or property interests therein.

Acts 1945, ch. 74, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 2726.21 (Williams, § 2726.48); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 42-402.

Law Reviews.

Constitutional Law — Airport Zoning Regulations, 19 Tenn. L. Rev. 858.

Collateral References.

Zoning regulations as applied to private and parochial schools below the college level. 74 A.L.R.3d 14.

42-6-103. Airport zoning regulations for airport hazard area — Adoption — Enforcement.

In order to prevent the creation or establishment of airport hazards, every municipality or county having an airport hazard area within its territorial limits shall adopt, administer and enforce, under the police power and in the manner and upon the conditions prescribed in this chapter, airport zoning regulations for such airport hazard area, which regulations may divide such area into zones, and, within such zones, specify the land uses permitted and prohibited and regulated and restrict the height to which structures and trees may be erected or allowed to grow; provided, that these regulations are solely for the purposes of preventing airport hazards.

Where an airport or an airport hazard area related to such airport, owned or controlled by a municipality, or established in cooperation with the appropriate federal agency, is located either partially or wholly outside the corporate limits of the municipality, the municipality owning or controlling the airport, and the county or counties within which the airport and the airport hazard area are located, shall adopt, by joint resolution, airport zoning regulations, or the county or counties shall authorize by resolution the adoption of such regulations by the municipality. The county or counties shall adopt regulations providing for enforcement by the municipality of the provisions of the ordinance.

If, in the judgment of the municipality, the county or counties fail to adopt or enforce reasonably adequate airport zoning regulations for such area, or if the county or counties refuse to participate in some method of jointly adopting and administering airport zoning regulations, the municipality owning or controlling the airport, with the approval of the agency of the state government charged with fostering civil aeronautics, shall itself adopt, administer, and enforce airport zoning regulations for the airport hazard area in question.

In the event of conflict between such regulations and any zoning regulations adopted by the county or counties within which the airport hazard area is located, the regulations of the municipality owning or controlling the airport shall govern and prevail.

This section applies to airports established in cooperation with the appropriate federal agency.

The requirements of adoption of a plan shall be permissive in any county having a metropolitan form of government and having a population of greater than one hundred thousand (100,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 1945, ch. 74, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 2726.22 (Williams, § 2726.49); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 42-403; Acts 1992, ch. 594, §§ 2-4, 6.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Law Reviews.

Constitutional Law — Airport Zoning Regulations, 19 Tenn. L. Rev. 858.

Attorney General Opinions. Municipality zoning authority for airport located outside city limits, OAG 99-180 (9/17/99).

42-6-104. Relation to other zoning ordinances — Resolution of conflicts.

In the event a political subdivision has adopted, or hereafter adopts, a zoning ordinance under powers granted by title 13, chapter 7, part 1 or title 13, chapter 7, part 2, or by a private act regulating, among other things, the height of buildings, any airport zoning regulations applicable to the same area or portion of the area may be incorporated in and made a part of the zoning ordinance, and be administered and enforced in connection therewith.

In the event of conflict between any airport zoning regulations adopted under this law and any other zoning ordinance applicable to the same area, the more restricted limitation or requirement shall govern and prevail.

Acts 1945, ch. 74, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 2726.23 (Williams, § 2726.50); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 42-404.

Cross-References. Zoning by county legislative body of territory outside of municipalities, title 13, ch. 7, part 1.

42-6-105. Certification of zoning plan.

Before the chief legislative body of a political subdivision may exercise the powers granted by §42-6-103, the zoning plan shall be certified by the agency of the state government charged with fostering civil aeronautics and by a municipal or regional planning commission created under title 13, chapter 4, part 1 or title 13, chapter 4, part 2, if the planning commission exists.

Acts 1945, ch. 74, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 2726.24 (Williams, § 2726.51); impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 542, §§ 1-3, 15; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 42-405; Acts 2015, ch. 72, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Section 13-1-101, referred to in this section, was repealed and the state planning office abolished by Acts 1995, ch. 501, effective June 12, 1995.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “or title 13, chapter 4, part 2, if the planning commission exists” for “; title 13, chapter 4, part 2; or §§13-2-101 and13-2-102, if the planning commission exists or in its absence by the state planning office created by §13-1-101 or its successor” at the end of the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 72, § 5. April 6, 2015.

42-6-106. Hearing on zoning ordinance — Notice — Approval or disapproval.

Before enacting the zoning ordinance or any amendment thereof, the chief legislative body shall hold a public hearing on the ordinance or amendment, at least fifteen (15) days' notice of the time and place of which shall be published in the official municipal journal or in a newspaper of general local circulation. No change in or departure from the text or maps as certified under §42-6-103 shall be made, unless the change or departure is first submitted to the planning commission or office and approved by it or, if disapproved, receive the favorable vote of a majority of the entire membership of the chief legislative body.

Acts 1945, ch. 74, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 2726.25 (Williams, § 2726.52); impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 542, § 15; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 42-406.

Collateral References.

Construction and application of statute or ordinance provisions requiring notice as prerequisite to granting variance or exception to zoning requirement. 38 A.L.R.3d 167.

42-6-107. Amendments to ordinance — Procedure.

The zoning ordinance, including the maps, may from time to time be amended, but no amendment shall become effective unless it be first submitted to and approved by the agencies originally certifying the ordinance or, if disapproved, shall receive the favorable vote of a majority of the entire membership of the chief legislative body.

Acts 1945, ch. 74, § 7; C. Supp. 1950, § 2726.26 (Williams, § 2726.53); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 42-407.

Collateral References.

Validity, construction, and effect of agreement to rezone, or amendment to zoning ordinance, creating special restrictions or conditions not applicable to other property similarly zoned. 70 A.L.R.3d 125.

42-6-108. Board of appeals — Creation — Members — Term — Duties and jurisdiction.

The chief legislative body shall create a board of zoning appeals of three (3) or five (5) members, and shall specify the mode of appointment of members to the board and their terms, which terms shall be of such length and so arranged that the term of one (1) member shall expire each year.

The compensation of the members of the board shall be as fixed by the members of the chief legislative body.

In the event a board of appeals exists or is created under title 13, chapter 7, part 1, or title 13, chapter 7, part 2, or by any private, special, or local act, the board of zoning appeals shall be designated by the chief legislative body to hear appeals from airport zoning ordinances created under this chapter.

The chief legislative body shall provide and specify, in its zoning or other ordinance, general rules to govern the organization and procedure and jurisdiction of the board of appeals, which rules shall not be inconsistent with this chapter; and the board of appeals may adopt supplemental rules of procedure, not inconsistent with this chapter or such general rules.

The zoning ordinance may provide that the board of appeals may, in appropriate cases and subject to the principles, standards, rules, conditions and safeguards set forth in the ordinance, make special exceptions to the terms of the zoning regulations in harmony with their general purpose and intent.

The chief legislative body may also authorize the board of appeals to interpret the zoning maps and pass upon disputed questions of lot lines or district boundary lines or similar questions as they arise in the administration of the zoning regulations.

Acts 1945, ch. 74, § 8; C. Supp. 1950, § 2726.27 (Williams, § 2726.54); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 42-408.

Cross-References. County and municipal zoning regulations, title 13, ch. 7.

Law Reviews.

Constitutional Law — Airport Zoning Regulations, 19 Tenn. L. Rev. 858.

42-6-109. Parties to appeals — Powers of appeal board.

Appeals to the board of appeals may be taken by any person aggrieved or by any officer, department, board or bureau of the municipality or other political subdivision affected by any grant or refusal of a building permit or other act or decision of the enforcing official or other administrative official based in whole or in part upon the provisions of any ordinance enacted under this chapter.

The board of appeals has the following powers:

To hear and decide any error appellant alleges to be in any order, requirement, permit, decision or refusal made by the municipal building commissioner or any other administrative official in carrying out or enforcing any provision of any ordinance enacted pursuant to this chapter;

To hear and decide, in accordance with the provisions of any such ordinance, requests for special exceptions or for interpretation of the map or for decisions upon other special questions upon which the board is authorized by any such ordinance to pass;

Where, by reason of exceptional narrowness, shallowness or shape of a specific piece of property at the time of the enactment of the zoning regulation, or by reason of exceptional topographic conditions or other extraordinary and exceptional situation or condition of such piece of property, the strict application of any regulation enacted under this law would result in peculiar and exceptional practical difficulties to or exceptional or undue hardship upon the owner of the property, to authorize, upon an appeal relating to the property, a variance from such strict application so as to relieve such difficulties or hardship; provided, that such relief may be granted without substantial detriment to the public good and without substantially impairing the intent and purpose of the zoning plan and zoning ordinance; and

In granting any variance or approving the issuance of any permit under this section, the administrative agency or board of appeals may, if it deems such action advisable to effectuate the purposes of this chapter and reasonable in circumstances, so condition the permit or variance as to require the owner of the structure or tree in question to permit the political subdivision, at its own expense, to install, operate, and maintain suitable obstruction markers and obstruction lights thereon.

Acts 1945, ch. 74, § 8; C. Supp. 1950, § 2726.27 (Williams, § 2726.54); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 42-409.

Cross-References. Zoning by county legislative body of territory outside of municipalities, §13-7-302.

Collateral References.

Standing of owner of property adjacent to zoned property, but not within territory of zoning authority, to attack zoning. 69 A.L.R.3d 805.

42-6-110. Enforcement of ordinance — Remedies.

The chief legislative body may provide for the enforcement of any ordinance enacted under this chapter.

A violation of any such ordinance is a Class A misdemeanor.

In case any building or structure is or is proposed to be erected, constructed, reconstructed, altered, converted, or maintained, or any building, structure or land is or is proposed to be used in violation of any ordinance enacted under this chapter, the building commissioner, municipal counsel or other appropriate authority of the municipality or other political subdivision or any adjacent or neighboring property owner who would be specially damaged by such violation, may, in addition to other remedies, institute injunction, mandamus or other appropriate action or proceeding to prevent such unlawful erection, construction, reconstruction, alteration, conversion, maintenance, use, or to correct or abate the violation or to prevent the occupancy of the building, structure or land.

Acts 1945, ch. 74, § 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 2726.28 (Williams, § 2726.55); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 42-410; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 1.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

42-6-111. Airport zoning regulations to be reasonable.

All airport zoning regulations adopted under this chapter shall be reasonable, and none shall impose any requirements or restrictions that are not reasonably necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter.

In determining what regulations it may adopt, each political subdivision and joint airport zoning board shall consider, among other things, the character of the flying operations expected to be conducted at the airport, and the nature of the terrain within the airport hazard area.

Acts 1945, ch. 74, § 10; C. Supp. 1950, § 2726.29 (Williams, § 2726.56); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 42-411.

Law Reviews.

Constitutional Law — Airport Zoning Regulations, 19 Tenn. L. Rev. 858.

42-6-112. Restriction on zoning regulations.

No airport zoning regulation adopted under this chapter shall require the removal, lowering, or other change or alteration of any structure or tree not conforming to the regulations when adopted or amended, or otherwise interfere with the continuance of any nonconforming use, except as provided in §42-6-113.

Acts 1945, ch. 74, § 11; C. Supp. 1950, § 2726.30 (Williams, § 2726.57); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 42-412.

Law Reviews.

Airports and Their Neighbors, 19 Tenn. L. Rev. 563.

Collateral References.

Building in course of construction as establishing valid nonconforming use or vested right to complete construction for intended use. 89 A.L.R.3d 1051.

42-6-113. Acquisition of air rights.

In any case in which:

It is desired to remove, lower, or otherwise terminate a nonconforming use;

The approach protection necessary cannot, because of constitutional limitations, be provided by airport zoning regulations under this law; or

It appears advisable that the necessary approach protection be provided by acquisition of property rights rather than by airport zoning regulations;

the political subdivision within which the property or nonconforming use is located or the political subdivision owning the airport or served by it may acquire, by purchase, grant, or condemnation in the manner provided by the law under which political subdivisions are authorized to acquire real property for public purposes, such an air right, easement, or other estate or interest in the property or nonconforming use in question as may be necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter.

Acts 1945, ch. 74, § 12; C. Supp. 1950, § 2726.31 (Williams, § 2726.58); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 42-413.

42-6-114. Regulations and standards controlling over other laws.

Whenever the regulations made under authority of this chapter require a lower height of buildings or impose other higher standards than are required in any other law, provision made under regulations or authority of this chapter shall govern.

Acts 1945, ch. 74, § 13; C. Supp. 1950, § 2726.32 (Williams, § 2726.59); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 42-414.

42-6-115. Zoning under special acts.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be deemed to supplant or modify the provisions of any special or private act relating to the zoning or zoning powers of any municipality or county to which the special or private act is applicable, and all the provisions of the special or private act shall remain in full force and effect; but, insofar as this chapter is not inconsistent with the provisions of such special or private act, this chapter shall apply to the zoning powers and procedure of the municipality or county.

Acts 1945, ch. 74, § 14; C. Supp. 1950, § 2726.33 (Williams, § 2726.60); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 42-415.

42-6-116. Incompatible use prohibited — Airport noise compatibility plan not required.

Notwithstanding this chapter or any zoning ordinance or resolution created under the powers granted pursuant to title 13, chapter 7, part 1 or 2, or pursuant to any private act, no structure shall be erected or use of land approved that would create an incompatible use. The appropriate local governing body shall give adequate notice to any affected airport governing body of any proposal for a zoning classification change or building variance before the local governing body considers the change or variance.

Any airport that has not conducted an airport noise compatibility plan, pursuant to title 14 of the Code of Federal Regulations, part 150, shall not be required to conduct such a study, nor shall it be required to adopt zoning for purposes of addressing incompatible use.

Subsection (a) does not apply in any county having a metropolitan form of government and having a population greater than one hundred thousand (100,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 1992, ch. 594, §§ 5, 6.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.